Missouri, session 2026, HB3203.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 198, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
2 known as section 198.019, to read as follows:
198.019. 1. As used in this section, the term "long-term care facility" means any
2 facility licensed under this chapter.
3 2. Each long-term care facility shall maintain liability insurance covering death
4 and personal injury of residents and guests resulting from the negligent acts or
5 omissions of the long-term facility or its employees in a minimum amount of one million
6 dollars per occurrence and three million dollars in the total annual aggregate.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.